Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.297 is amended to read:
90.297. (1) Except as provided in ORS 90.295  and in this section, a landlord may not charge a
deposit or fee, however designated, to  an applicant who has applied to a landlord to enter a rental
agreement for a dwelling unit.
(2) A landlord may charge a  deposit[ , however designated, ] to an applicant for the purpose of
securing the execution of a rental agreement, only after approving  the applicant’s application but
prior to entering into a rental agreement. Before receiving the deposit, the landlord  must give the
applicant a written statement describing:
(a) The amount of rent and the fees the landlord will charge and  the deposits the landlord will
require; [ and]
(b) The terms of the agreement to execute a rental agreement ; and
(c) The conditions for refunding or retaining the deposit.
(3) If a rental agreement is executed, the landlord shall either apply  the deposit toward the
moneys due to the landlord under the rental agreement or refund [ it] the deposit  immediately  to
the tenant.
(4) If a rental agreement is not executed due  to a failure by the applicant to comply with the
agreement to execute, the landlord may retain the deposit , unless the applicant  has rejected the
agreement due to the discovery of  material defects relating to the premise’s habitability, as
described in ORS 90.320 (1) .
(5) If a rental agreement is not executed due to a failure by the landlord  to comply with the
agreement to execute  or due to a  tenant’s rejection of the agreement based on uninhabitability
as described in subsection (4) of this section , within [ four] five business  days  the landlord shall
return the deposit to the applicant either by making the deposit available to the applicant at the
landlord’s customary place of business or by  mailing the deposit by first class mail to the applicant.
(6) If a landlord fails to comply with this section, the  applicant or tenant[ , as the case may be, ]
may recover from the landlord :
(a) The amount of any fee or  deposit charged, [ plus $150.] as provided in subsection (5) of this
section; and
(b) If the repayment was not made timely under subsection (5) of this section,  and the
failure to repay  was not due to an act of God, a penalty equal to the greater of the deposit
or an amount agreed to by the parties.
Enrolled House Bill 3521 (HB 3521-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 90.297 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to deposits
received on or after January 1, 2026.
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3521 (HB 3521-A) Page 2